finished/swa.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [V] [1] [2] [3] [SG] [PL] [PST] [HAB] [PRS] [COND] [IND] [PRF] [INDF] [FIN] [FUT] [STEM] [DEF]

LEXICON Root

[V]:0                   PersonNumber;
[V][FIN]:ku             Stem;

LEXICON PersonNumber

[1][SG]:ni              Cond;
[2][SG]:u               Cond;
[3][SG]:a               Cond;
[1][PL]:tu              Cond;
[2][PL]:m               Cond;
[3][PL]:wa              Cond;

LEXICON Cond

[COND][PST]:ngali       Perfect;
[COND][PRS]:nge         TAM;
[IND]:0                 TAM;

LEXICON TAM

[PST]:li                Perfect;
[HAB]:hu                Perfect;
[PRS][DEF][FIN]:na      Perfect;
[FUT][FIN]:ta           Perfect;
[FIN]:0                 Perfect;


LEXICON Perfect

[PRF][PST]:me           Indef;
[PRS]:0                 Indef;
                        Indef;

LEXICON Indef
[INDF]:a                Fin;
                        Fin;
		  
LEXICON Fin
[FIN]:0                 Stem;
                        Stem;
		  
LEXICON Stem

[STEM]                  #;
